incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="perfekt/um__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>um</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>um</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>um</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ám</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ách</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á</l>
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="priate/ľ__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľa</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľovi</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľa</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľovi</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľ</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľu</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľom</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľ</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľov</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľom</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľov</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľoch</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lia</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľmi</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lia</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mrzáč/ik__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ika</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikovi</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kovi</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ika</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikovi</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kovi</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ik</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikom</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kom</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ik</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikov</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kov</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikom</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kom</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikov</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kov</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikoch</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>koch</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikovia</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kovia</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikmi</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kami</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikovia</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kovia</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="svokrovc/i__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="imperfektum"><i>imperfekt</i><par n="perfekt/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mrzáčik"><i>mrzáč</i><par n="mrzáč/ik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nováčik"><i>nováč</i><par n="mrzáč/ik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="penzum"><i>penz</i><par n="perfekt/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perfektum"><i>perfekt</i><par n="perfekt/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pluskvamperfektum"><i>pluskvamperfekt</i><par n="perfekt/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="priateľ"><i>priate</i><par n="priate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="referendum"><i>referend</i><par n="perfekt/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spasiteľ"><i>spasite</i><par n="priate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="susedovci"><i>susedovc</i><par n="svokrovc/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svatovci"><i>svatovc</i><par n="svokrovc/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svokrovci"><i>svokrovc</i><par n="svokrovc/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tesťovci"><i>tesťovc</i><par n="svokrovc/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="univerzum"><i>univerz</i><par n="perfekt/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="švagrovci"><i>švagrovc</i><par n="svokrovc/i__n"/></e>
